Connecticut, session 2026, SB00402.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10-244a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For the school year commencing July 1, 2013, and each school year
thereafter, no municipality or local or regional board of education may
employ or enter into an agreement, as described in subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of section 53a-217b, with any person, other than a sworn
member of an organized local police department or a retired police
officer as provided in subsection (b) of this section, to provide security
services in a public school if such person will possess a firearm, as
defined in section 53a-3, while in the performance of his or her duties.
(b) A municipality or a local or regional board of education may
employ or enter into an agreement with a retired police officer to
SB402 / File No. 301 1

SB402 File No. 301
provide security services in a public school if such retired police officer
is a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in 18 USC 926C,
as amended from time to time. Such retired police officer shall receive
annual training pursuant to section 7-294x and shall successfully
complete annual firearms training provided by a certified firearms
instructor that meets or exceeds the standards of the Police Officer
Standards and Training Council or 18 USC 926C, as amended from time
to time. Such retired police officer shall not be subject to the licensing
requirements of part II of chapter 534.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (b) of this section, "retired police
officer" means (1) a sworn member of an organized local police
department who was certified by the Police Officer Standards and
Training Council, [and] retired or separated in good standing from such
department [or] and is not prohibited from being hired by a law
enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c, (2) a sworn member of the
Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency Services
and Public Protection who retired or separated in good standing from
said division [, (2)] and is not prohibited from being hired by a law
enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c, (3) a sworn federal law
enforcement agent who retired or separated in good standing from such
federal law enforcement service, is not prohibited from being hired by a
law enforcement unit pursuant to section 7-291c and [who] meets or
exceeds the standards of the Police Officer Standards and Training
Council for certification in this state, or [(3)] (4) a sworn officer of an
organized police department in another state who was certified under
standards that meet or exceed the standards of the Police Officer
Standards and Training Council for certification in this state, [and who]
retired or separated in good standing from such department and is not
prohibited from being hired by a law enforcement unit pursuant to
section 7-291c.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 10-244a
SB402 / File No. 301 2

SB402 File No. 301
PS Joint Favorable
SB402 / File No. 301 3

SB402 File No. 301
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill specifies that school districts cannot hire security or police
officers who will possess a firearm if they are prohibited from being
hired by a law enforcement unit. The bill has no fiscal impact as it is not
expected to increase security costs incurred by school districts.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB402 / File No. 301 4

SB402 File No. 301
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 402
AN ACT REVISING THE DEFINITION OF "RETIRED POLICE
OFFICER" FOR PURPOSES OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS
REGARDING SCHOOL SECURITY SERVICES.